Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 27.7
REGIMENTED INMATE DISCIPLINE
AND TREATMENT PROGRAM

Section

17-27.7-101. Legislative declaration.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the program established pursuant to this article shall benefit the state by reducing prison overcrowding and shall benefit persons who have been convicted of offenses and placed in the custody of the department by promoting such person's personal development and self-discipline.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 963, § 1, effective June 7.

17-27.7-102. Regimented inmate training programs - authorization - standards for operation.

The department may develop and implement a regimented inmate training program. Any regimented inmate training program shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following aspects:

A military-styled intensive physical training and discipline program;

An educational and vocational assessment and training program emphasizing job seeking skills;

A health education program; and

A drug and alcohol education and treatment program which shall be structured as an integral part of the entire regimented inmate training program.

The department may establish and enforce standards for the regimented inmate training program and each of the aspects thereof described in subsection (1) of this section.

The regimented inmate training program shall be structured in such a manner that any offender who is assigned to the program by the executive director shall remain in the program for a period of ninety days, unless removed from the program and reassigned by the executive director for unsatisfactory performance. The executive director may authorize an extension of the program for any offender not to exceed thirty days when such extension will allow the offender to be considered for probation under rule 35b of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 963, § 1, effective June 7.

17-27.7-103. Regimented inmate training program - eligibility of offenders.

The executive director may assign an inmate to a regimented inmate training program pursuant to section 17-40-102 (2). The executive director shall assign to a regimented inmate training program only those inmates who are nonviolent offenders thirty years of age or younger who are not serving a sentence and have not served a previous sentence in a correctional facility for an unlawful sexual behavior offense described in section 16-22-102 (9), a crime of violence described in section 18-1.3-406, an assault offense described in part 2 of article 3 of title 18, or a child abuse offense described in part 4 of article 6 of title 18; or who are not presently serving a sentence for a nonviolent offense that was reduced from an unlawful sexual behavior offense described in section 16-22-102 (9), a crime of violence described in section 18-1.3-406, an assault offense described in part 2 of article 3 of title 18, or a child abuse offense described in part 4 of article 6 of title 18, as a result of a plea agreement; or who are not aliens subject to a removal order. Any offender assigned to the program must be free of any physical or mental disability that could jeopardize his or her ability to complete the program. The department may eliminate any offender from the program upon a determination by the department that a physical disability or a mental health disorder will prevent full participation in the program by the offender. The department is absolved of liability for participation in the program.

The executive director shall assign no more than one hundred offenders to the regimented inmate training program at any one time. No more than a maximum of four hundred offenders shall be assigned to the program in any one year. However, the executive director may assign offenders to the program to replace those offenders who fail to complete the program.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 964, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 254, § 1, effective March 16.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1508, § 172, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 187, § 1, effective April 1.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (HB 17-1046), ch. 50, p. 158, § 9, effective March 16.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-091), ch. 35, p. 386, § 18, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-091, see section 1 of chapter 35, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

17-27.7-104. Acceptance and completion of the program by an offender - reconsideration of sentence.

The department, upon acceptance of an offender into the program, shall immediately notify the court of such acceptance.

If an offender successfully completes a regimented inmate training program, such offender, within sixty days of termination or completion of the program, shall automatically be referred to the sentencing court so that the offender may make a motion for reduction of sentence pursuant to rule 35 (b) of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure.

The department shall submit a report to the court concerning such offender's performance in the program. Such report may recommend that the offender be placed in a specialized probation or community corrections program. The court may not summarily deny the offender's motion without a complete consideration of all pertinent information provided by the offender, the offender's attorney, and the district attorney. The court may issue an order modifying the offender's sentence and placing the offender on probation or in a community corrections program.

Notwithstanding the fact that the offender's case is on appeal, the sentencing court shall retain jurisdiction to consider and rule on motions for reconsideration filed pursuant to this subsection (2).

Any motion filed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be given priority for consideration by the sentencing court. An offender who successfully completes the regimented inmate training program within twenty-eight months prior to such offender's parole eligibility date shall be eligible for placement in a community corrections program operated pursuant to article 27 of this title.

An offender placed in a community corrections program pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) may be required to participate in a structured, transitional discipline program in such community corrections program for six months or until completion of the offender's sentence, whichever occurs first.

Upon satisfactory completion of the community corrections program, an offender whose sentence has not been completely served may be required to participate in the intensive supervision program pursuant to section 17-27.5-102.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 964, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 184, § 1, effective April 7.

L. 98:

(2)(c)(I) amended, p. 318, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2)(b.5) added, p. 557, § 3, effective April 16.

17-27.7-105. Evaluation of regimented inmate training program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 964, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 1267, § 186, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.